Idaho, session 2026, S1350.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 36, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3643, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3643. CASH ROUNDING. (1) If a seller is unable to settle a cash
transaction to the whole cent using denominations of United States coin or
currency on hand, the seller may round either the total amount due for the
transaction, or the amount of change due back to the purchaser, to the near-
est multiple of five cents (5¢) as follows:
(a) If the final digit of such amount is 1, 2, 6, or 7, the amount shall
be rounded down to the nearest multiple of five cents (5¢); and
(b) If the final digit of such amount is 3, 4, 8, or 9, the amount shall
be rounded up to the nearest multiple of five cents (5¢).
(2) The provisions of this section shall also apply to any cash refunds
of purchases.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "total amount due" means the sum
of the total sales price plus any applicable taxes, fees, or other charges
calculated to the nearest cent. Taxes shall be computed based on the total
sales price before any rounding occurs under this subsection.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-2361, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2361. CASH PAYMENT -- STATE AGENCIES. (1) Any official, depart-
ment, board, commission, or agency of the state of Idaho that accepts payment
for transactions shall accept cash as a method of payment along with any
other methods of payment the official, department, board, commission, or
agency may accept.
(2) No official, department, board, commission, or agency of the state
of Idaho may charge any additional fee for cash payment. Any amounts charged
or withheld due to cash rounding pursuant to section 63-3643, Idaho Code,
shall not constitute a fee under this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.